Utah statutes.
10-2-604.   Duty of county legislative body when petition is by electors.

When the petition for consolidation is properly presented by the electors, the county legislative bodies and officers of each of the respective municipalities shall, within 15 days after the filing of the petition with the county legislative bodies, cause to be filed with the county legislative bodies a plan of consolidation containing the same information as is required in Section 10-2-603.

